Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2662.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1218.1(g) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1218.1. Permit for Classroom Monitors.--* * *[(g) This section shall expire on June 30, 2026.]Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.1234567891011121314